test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-contracted_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Contracted syllable adjectives belonging to FIINNIS, DEAHTIS, SMAVIS, STUORIS, NJALGGAT, CAPPIS, VIISSIS, RAHPIS, HARVVIS

Tests:
  Adj - fiinnis: # FIINNIS
    fiinnis+A+Attr: fiinna
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Nom: fiinnis
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Gen: [fiidná, fiidnása]
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Acc: [fiidná, fiidnása]
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Ill: [fiidnái, fiidnásii]
    fiinnis+A+Sg+Loc: [fiidnás, fiidnásis]
    fiinnis+A+Pl+Acc: [fiidnáid, fiidnásiid]
    fiinnis+A+Pl+Com: [fiidnáiguin, fiidnásiiguin]
    fiinnis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [fiidnát, fiidnásut, fiidnásabbo, fiidnásat, fiidnásit, fiidnáseabbo, fiidnáset]
    fiinnis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [fiidnábuid, fiidnásabbuid, fiidnáseappuid]
    fiinnis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [fiidnámus, fiidnásamos, fiidnáseamos]
    fiinnis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [fiidnámusain, fiidnásamosiin, fiidnásepmosiin]
    fiinnis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [fiidnát, fiidnásit]

  Adj - čoaskkis: # DEAHTIS
    čoaskkis+A+Attr: [čoaska, čoaskkes]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Nom: čoaskkis
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Gen: [čoaská, čoaskása]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Acc: [čoaská, čoaskása]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Ill: [čoaskái, čoaskásii]
    čoaskkis+A+Sg+Loc: [čoaskás, čoaskásis]
    čoaskkis+A+Pl+Acc: [čoaskáid, čoaskásiid]
    čoaskkis+A+Pl+Com: [čoaskáiguin, čoaskásiiguin]
    čoaskkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [čoaskát, čoaskásut, čoaskásabbo, čoaskásat, čoaskásit, čoaskáseabbo, čoaskáset]
    čoaskkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [čoaskábuid, čoaskásabbuid, čoaskáseappuid]
    čoaskkis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [čoaskámus, čoaskásamos, čoaskáseamos]
    čoaskkis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [čoaskásamosiin, čoaskámusain, čoaskásepmosiin]
    čoaskkis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [čoaskát, čoaskásit]

  Adj - smávis: # SMAVIS
    smávis+A+Attr: smávva
    smávis+A+Sg+Nom: smávis
    smávis+A+Sg+Gen: [smávvá, smávvása]
    smávis+A+Sg+Acc: [smávvá, smávvása]
    smávis+A+Sg+Ill: [smávvái, smávvásii]
    smávis+A+Sg+Loc: [smávvás, smávvásis]
    smávis+A+Pl+Acc: [smávváid, smávvásiid]
    smávis+A+Pl+Com: [smávváiguin, smávvásiiguin]
    smávis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [smávvát, smávvásut, smávvásabbo, smávvásat, smávit, smávváset, smávvásit, smávváseabbo]
    smávis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [smávvábuid, smávvásabbuid, smávibuid, smávváseappuid]
    smávis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [smávvámus, smávvásamos, smávimus, smávváseamos]
    smávis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [smávvásamosiin, smávvámusain, smávimusain, smávvásepmosiin]
    smávis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [smávvát, smávvásit]

  Adj - stuoris: # STUORIS
    stuoris+A+Attr: [stuorra, stuora]
    stuoris+A+Sg+Nom: stuoris
    stuoris+A+Sg+Gen: stuorrá
    stuoris+A+Sg+Acc: stuorrá
    stuoris+A+Sg+Ill: stuorrái
    stuoris+A+Sg+Loc: stuorrás
    stuoris+A+Pl+Acc: stuorráid
    stuoris+A+Pl+Com: stuorráiguin
    stuoris+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [stuorit, stuorát]
    stuoris+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [stuoribuid, stuorábuid]
    stuoris+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [stuorimus, stuorámus]
    stuoris+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [stuorimusain, stuorámusain]
    stuoris+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stuorrát
    
  Adj - čáppat: # NJALGGAT
    čáppat+A+Attr: čáppa
    čáppat+A+Sg+Nom: čáppat
    čáppat+A+Sg+Gen: čábbá
    čáppat+A+Sg+Acc: čábbá
    čáppat+A+Sg+Ill: čábbái
    čáppat+A+Sg+Loc: čábbás
    čáppat+A+Pl+Acc: čábbáid
    čáppat+A+Pl+Com: čábbáiguin
    čáppat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [čábbát, čábbásut, čábbásabbo, čábbásat, čábbásit, čábbáset, čábbáseabbo]
    čáppat+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [čábbábuid, čábbásabbuid, čábbáseappuid]
    čáppat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [čábbámus, čábbásamos, čábbáseamos]
    čáppat+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [čábbámusain, čábbásamosiin, čábbásepmosiin]
    čáppat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [čábbát, čábbásit]

  Adj - njálggis: # CAPPIS
    njálggis+A+Attr: njálgga
    njálggis+A+Sg+Nom: njálggis
    njálggis+A+Sg+Gen: njálgá
    njálggis+A+Sg+Acc: njálgá
    njálggis+A+Sg+Ill: njálgái
    njálggis+A+Sg+Loc: njálgás
    njálggis+A+Pl+Acc: njálgáid
    njálggis+A+Pl+Com: njálgáiguin
    njálggis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [njálgát, njálgásut, njálgásabbo, njálgásat, njálgásit, njálgáseabbo, njálgáset]
    njálggis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [njálgábuid, njálgásabbuid, njálgáseappuid]
    njálggis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [njálgámus, njálgásamos, njálgáseamos]
    njálggis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [njálgámusain, njálgásamosiin, njálgásepmosiin]
    njálggis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [njálgát, njálgásit]

  Adj - rikkis: # VIISSIS
    rikkis+A+Attr: rikkes
    rikkis+A+Sg+Nom: rikkis
    rikkis+A+Sg+Gen: [riggá, riggása]
    rikkis+A+Sg+Acc: [riggá, riggása]
    rikkis+A+Sg+Ill: [riggái, riggásii]
    rikkis+A+Sg+Loc: [riggás, riggásis]
    rikkis+A+Pl+Acc: [riggáid, riggásiid]
    rikkis+A+Pl+Com: [riggáiguin, riggásiiguin]
    rikkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [riggát, riggásut, riggásabbo, riggásat, riggásit, riggáset, riggáseabbo]
    rikkis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [riggábuid, riggásabbuid, riggáseappuid]
    rikkis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [riggámus, riggásamos, riggáseamos]
    rikkis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [riggámusain, riggásamosiin, riggásepmosiin]
    rikkis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [riggát, riggásit]
    
  Adj - ráhpis: # RAHPIS
    ráhpis+A+Attr: ráhpes
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Nom: ráhpis
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Gen: [ráhppá, ráhppása]
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Acc: [ráhppá, ráhppása]
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Ill: [ráhppái, ráhppásii]
    ráhpis+A+Sg+Loc: [ráhppás, ráhppásis]
    ráhpis+A+Pl+Acc: [ráhppáid, ráhppásiid]
    ráhpis+A+Pl+Com: [ráhppáiguin, ráhppásiiguin]
    ráhpis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [ráhppát, ráhppásut, ráhppásabbo, ráhppásat, ráhppásit, ráhppáset, ráhppáseabbo]
    ráhpis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [ráhppábuid, ráhppásabbuid, ráhppáseappuid]
    ráhpis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [ráhppámus, ráhppásamos, ráhppáseamos]
    ráhpis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [ráhppámusain, ráhppásamosiin, ráhppásepmosiin]
    ráhpis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ráhppát, ráhppásit]

  Adj - hárvvis: # HARVVIS
    hárvvis+A+Attr: hárve
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Nom: hárvvis
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Gen: [hárvása, hárvá]
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Acc: [hárvása, hárvá]
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Ill: [hárvásii, hárvái]
    hárvvis+A+Sg+Loc: [hárvásis, hárvás]
    hárvvis+A+Pl+Acc: [hárvásiid, hárváid]
    hárvvis+A+Pl+Com: [hárvásiiguin, hárváiguin]
    hárvvis+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [hárvvit, hárvásit, hárvásabbo, hárváset, hárváseabbo, hárvásut, hárvásat]
    hárvvis+A+Der/Comp+A+Pl+Acc: [hárvvibuid, hárváseappuid, hárvásabbuid]
    hárvvis+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [hárvvimus, hárváseamos, hárvásamos]
    hárvvis+A+Der/Superl+A+Pl+Loc: [hárvvimusain, hárvásamosiin, hárvásepmosiin]
    hárvvis+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [hárvvit, hárvásit]
